Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 475B.759 is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in  the account must be transferred to the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10  percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of all cities of this state  that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined  by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located  in each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer  licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent  of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090,  475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1555 (SB 1555-A) Page 1
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises  located in each county compared to
the number  of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for [ purposes for which
moneys in the Mental Health Alcoholism  and Drug Services Account established under ORS 430.380
may be used ] mental health treatment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early inter-
vention and treatment ;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys  in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an  ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070,  475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100  or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each  city and
county in this state shall certify  with the commission whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance of  a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the  city is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this  section. If a county fails
to comply with this subsection,  the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475B.759, as amended by section 1 of this 2018 Act, is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to  the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population  of all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)  of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1555 (SB 1555-A) Page 2
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially available  area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number  of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for [ mental health treatment
or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention  and treatment ] purposes for which
moneys in the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug  Services Account established under ORS
430.380 may be used ;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys  in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an  ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070,  475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100  or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each  city and
county in this state shall certify  with the commission whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance of  a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the  city is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this  section. If a county fails
to comply with this subsection,  the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 475B.759 by section 1 of this 2018 Act apply to
moneys transferred to the Oregon Marijuana Account under ORS  475B.760 after the effective
date of this 2018 Act, and before July 1, 2019.
(2) The amendments to ORS 475B.759 by section 2 of this 2018 Act  apply to moneys
transferred to the Oregon Marijuana Account under ORS 475B.760 on or after July 1, 2019.
SECTION 4. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1555 (SB 1555-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 9, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1555 (SB 1555-A) Page 4